dev/verbs/tgl.twol
Alphabet 

  %+:0 b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z a e i o u

  !E:a E:i E:o E:u E:e
  !R:p R:b R:t R:k R:l 
  !N:m N:n
  E:0 R:0 N:0
  X:0 Y:0 S:0 F:0

  %+:0 %>:0 %^UM:0 %^INF:0 %^IN:0 %^FILL:0 %^INDRE:0 U:0;

Sets

  Cons = p t k b ; 
  Vow = a e i o u ;
  Nas = m n ;
  Segm = Cons Vow Nas ;
  InfA = u i ;
  InfB = m n ;

Rules
! bili>in --> bilhin
"Replace final i with h before suffixes beginning with i" 
i:h <=> _ %>:0 i ;

!€ bili%>in
!€ bilh0in

! man>bili --> mambili

"Nasal assimilation"
n:m <=> _ %>:0 b: ; 

!€ man%>bili
!€ mam0bili

! mambili --> mamili

"Nasal deletion"
b:0 <=> :m %>:0 _ ;

!€ mam%>bili
!€ mam00ili

!"Infix -um-"
!U:0 => _ %+:0 R:R 0:u 0:m E:E ; 

!"Infixation of -um-"
!%^INF:0 <=> #:0 Cons 0:u 0:m Segm+ _ ;

! ibibili
!!"Infixation of -in-"
!!%^IN:0 <=> #:0 R 0:i 0:n E+ _ ;

!"Test to fill in RE"
!%^FILL:0 <=> #:0 R E+ _ ;

!	7. X:0 <=> ___ +:0 C:C 0:u 0:m V:V
	
! %^UM>bili --> bumili
!"Infix insertion"
!%^UM:0 <=> %>:0 _ @P.ACT1.ON@ ; 

!€ %^UM%>bili
!€ 00bumili

"S realisation as Consonant and -um-"
S:DD <=> _ InfA InfB E: %+: DD ;
	where DD in Cons ;

!"F realisation as Vowel and -um-"
!F:WW <=> _ %+: (Cons:) WW;
!	where WW in Vow ;

!"Infix symbol 1"
!X:IX <=> _ IX ;
!	where IX in InfA;

!"Infix symbol 2"
!Y:IY <=> _ IY ;
!	where IY in InfB;

"R realisation as Consonant"
R:CC <=> _ E: %+: CC ; 
	where CC in Cons ;

"E realisation as Vowel"
E:VV <=> _ %+: (Cons:) VV ; 
	where VV in Vow ;
